en: Brass instrument valve configuration: Piston + rotary (compensating/trigger); Piston valves; Rotary valves; Slide; Slide + valves; Valveless (natural/bugle-style); Other
zh-CN: 铜管乐器阀键配置: 活塞 + 转阀（补偿/触发器）; 活塞阀; 转阀; 拉管; 拉管 + 活塞; 无阀（自然/军号款）; 其他
da: Konfiguration af messinginstrumentets ventil: Stempel- + rotorventil (kompenserende/udløser); Stempelventiler; Rotorventiler; Træk; Træk + ventiler; Uden ventiler (naturhorn/signalhorn); Andet
fi: Vaskipuhaltimen venttiilikokoonpano: Mäntä ja roottori (kompensoiva/vipu); Mäntäventtiilit; Roottoriventtiilit; Luisti; Luisti ja venttiilit; Venttiilitön (luonnollinen/bugle-tyylinen); Muu
ru: Конфигурация клапанов духового инструмента: Помповая + вентильная (компенсационная/триггерная); Помповая механика; Вентильная механика; Кулиса; Кулиса + клапаны; Без клапанов (натуральная/горн); Другое
pt-PT: Configuração de válvula do instrumento de latão: Pistão + cilindro (compensação/acionador); Pistões; Válvulas rotativas; Vara; Vara + válvulas; Sem válvulas (natural/estilo clarim); Outro
nl: Koperblaasinstrument ventielconfiguratie: Piston en cilinder (compenserend/trigger); Pistonventielen; Cilinderventielen; Schuif; Schuif en ventielen; Ventielloos (natuurhoorn/bugelstijl); Overig
pl: Konfiguracja zaworów instrumentów blaszanych: Tłokowe + obrotowe (system kompensacyjny / z kwartwentylem); Wentyle tłokowe; Wentyle obrotowe; Suwak; Suwak + wentyle; Bez wentyli (naturalne / sygnałowe); Inna
nb: Konfigurasjon av ventil for messinginstrument: Stempel + roterende (kompenserende/utløser); Stempelventiler; Rotorventiler; Trekk; Trekk + ventiler; Uten ventiler (natur-/fanfarestil); Annet
sv: Konfiguration av ventil för mässingsinstrument: Pumpventil + cylinder (kompenserande/trigger); Pumpventiler; Cylinderventiler; Drag; Drag + ventiler; Utan ventiler (naturhorn/klarion); Övrigt
es: Configuración de la válvula para instrumentos de viento-metal: Pistón + cilindro (compensación/activador); Pistones; Cilindros; Vara; Vara + válvulas; Sin válvulas (natural/estilo clarín); Otra
ja: 真鍮製計器バルブの構造: ピストン＋ロータリー (コンペンセイティング/トリガー); ピストンバルブ; ロータリーバルブ; スライド; スライド＋バルブ; バルブなし (ナチュラル/ビューグルスタイル); その他
zh-TW: 銅管樂器閥門配置: 活塞 + 轉閥 (補償/扳鍵); 活塞; 轉閥; 伸縮管; 伸縮管 + 活塞; 無閥 (自然/軍號款式); 其他
cs: Konfigurace ventilů žesťového nástroje: Pístové + cylindrické (kompenzační / s dolaďovačem); Pístové ventily; Cylindrické ventily; Snížec; Snížec + ventily; Bez ventilů (přirozené / typu polnice); Jiné
el: Διαμόρφωση βαλβίδας χάλκινων οργάνων: Έμβολο + περιστροφική βαλβίδα (αντιστάθμιση/σκανδάλη); Εμβολοφόρες βαλβίδες; Περιστροφικές βαλβίδες; Ολκός; Ολκός + βαλβίδες; Χωρίς βαλβίδες (φυσικό/τύπου σάλπιγγας); Άλλο
th: การจัดวางวาล์วของเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง: ลูกสูบ + โรตารี (ชดเชยเสียง/ทริกเกอร์); ลูกสูบวาล์ว; โรตารีวาล์ว; สไลด์; สไลด์ + วาล์ว; ไม่มีวาล์ว (สไตล์แตรเดี่ยว/แตรเขาสัตว์); อื่นๆ
ko: 금관악기 밸브 구성: 피스톤 + 로터리(보정/트리거); 피스톤 밸브; 로터리 밸브; 슬라이드; 슬라이드 + 밸브; 밸브리스(내추럴/뷰글 스타일); 기타
hr-HR: Konfiguracija ventila za limene instrumente: Klipni i rotacijski (kompenzacijski/pokretač); Klipni ventili; Rotacijski ventili; Povlačak; Povlačak i ventili; Bez ventila (prirodni/u stilu roga); Ostalo
lt-LT: Varinio pučiamojo instrumento vožtuvų konfigūracija: Stūmoklinis + sukamasis (kompensacinis / gaidukas); Stūmokliniai vožtuvai; Sukamieji vožtuvai; Slankiklis; Slankiklis + vožtuvai; Bevožtuvinis (natūralus / rago tipo); Kita
pt-BR: Configuração de válvula para instrumento de sopro de metal: Pisto + rotor (compensação/acionador); Válvulas de pisto; Válvulas rotativas; Vara/Pompa; Vara/pompa + válvulas; Sem válvulas (natural/estilo corneta); Outros
tr: Pirinç üflemeli çalgı valf yapılandırması: Piston ve döner (telafi edici/tetik); Piston valfler; Döner valfler; Sürgü; Sürgü ve valfler; Valfsiz (doğal/boru stili); Diğer
sl-SI: Konfiguracija ventila za trobila: Batni + rotacijski (kompenzacijski/sprožilec); Batni ventili; Rotacijski ventili; Poteg; Poteg in ventili; Brez ventilov (naravni stil / stil troblje); Drugo
sk-SK: Konfigurácia ventilu pre dychové nástroje: Piestové + rotačné (kompenzačné/spúšťač); Piestové ventily; Rotačné ventily; Znižec; Znižec + ventily; Bez ventilov (prirodzené/poľnica); Iné
ro-RO: Configurația valvei pentru instrumente din alamă: Piston + rotativ (compensare/declanșator); Supape cu piston; Supape rotative; Culisă; Culisă + supape; Fără supape (natural/stil goarnă); Altele
fr: Configuration des pistons d’instrument de la famille des cuivres: Piston + barillet (compensation/déclencheur); Pistons; Barillets; Coulisse; Coulisse + pistons; Sans piston (naturel/clairon); Autre
hu: Rézfúvós hangszer szelepkonfigurációja: Dugattyús + forgószelepes (kompenzáló/kiváltó); Dugattyús szelepek; Forgószelepek; Tolócső; Tolócső + szelepek; Szelep nélküli (natúr/vadászkürt stílusú); Egyéb
bg-BG: Конфигурация на клапаните при месингови музикални инструменти: Бутални + роторни (компенсиращи/с тригер); Бутални вентили; Роторни вентили; Цуг; Цуг + вентили; Без вентили (натурални/тип бъгъл); Друго
it: Configurazione della valvola strumentale in ottone: Pistoni + cilindri (compensazione/trigger); Valvole a pistone; Valvole a cilindro; Coulisse; Coulisse + valvole; Senza valvole (naturale/stile tromba); Altro
vi: Cấu hình van nhạc cụ bằng đồng thau: Pít-tông + xoay (cơ chế bù/cò); Van pít-tông; Van xoay; Ống trượt; Ống trượt + van; Không van (kiểu tự nhiên/kèn bugle); Khác
de: Konfiguration des Blechblasinstrument-Ventils: Pump- + Drehventil (Kompensation/Trigger); Pumpventile; Drehventile; Zug; Zug + Ventile; Ohne Ventile (Naturhorn/Fanfare); Sonstiges